Hawaii, session 2025, SB1614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a persistent housing shortage.  Demand for housing significantly outpaces supply, particularly in urban areas. Transit-oriented development districts present a critical opportunity for efficient land use by promoting higher-density development near public transit infrastructure, thereby maximizing the value of public investments.  Higher residential density in transit‑oriented development districts increases public transit ridership, thus reducing dependency on private automobiles and lowering greenhouse gas emissions, which supports the State's climate resilience and sustainability objectives. The legislature established transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement districts to foster community development by strategically investing in infrastructure improvements through Act 184, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. The legislature found that transit-oriented development promotes development patterns that enhance residents' quality of life; preserve the natural environment; provide a range of housing choices for residents; and encourage walking, biking, and the use of mass transit.  Furthermore, the legislature concluded that the State plays an important role in overcoming barriers to transit-oriented development by encouraging needed investments in improving regional infrastructure such as roads, sewers, power, communication, and storm water management systems. The legislature further recognizes that the ready availability of affordable workforce housing near transit hubs reduces transportation costs and improves access to employment, education, and other essential services, especially for low- and moderate-income households, thereby advancing social and economic equity for the people of Hawaii. The underutilization of land in transit-oriented development districts, due partially to restrictive development standards, undermines the economic and environmental benefits of state investments in county-designated transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement districts, contributes to urban sprawl, and increases infrastructure costs and environmental degradation. The legislature finds that numerous jurisdictions, including California, Oregon, and Washington, have adopted minimum density standards for transit-oriented developments, demonstrating the effectiveness of these measures in increasing housing supply while bolstering transit systems.  Transit‑oriented development infrastructure improvement districts can increase residential density near transit hubs in order to foster vibrant, walkable communities; support local businesses; and generate higher property tax revenues, contributing to Hawaii's fiscal and economic vitality. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Define transit-oriented development for purposes of state implementation of transit-oriented development; (2)  Incentivize development in county-designated transit‑oriented development areas; and (3)  Allocate a minimum percentage of the rental housing revolving fund for certain mixed-income rental housing projects or units. SECTION 2.  Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201H-    Transit-oriented development; criteria for certain financing.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, development in a county-designated transit-oriented development area, as defined in section 226-63(d), shall have priority for financing; provided that: (1)  Development standards for the transit-oriented development area allow an average floor area ratio equal to or greater than the transit-supportive densities set forth in this section; (2)  Housing units in the transit-oriented development area with density increases authorized pursuant to this section shall be made available exclusively to qualified residents as defined in section 201H-32; (3)  Permits for development in the transit-oriented development area are processed as a ministerial permit subject to applicable objective design standards; (4)  There is no imposition of a development standard that renders it impracticable to build a usable structure for the permitted uses at the applicable transit-supportive density; and (5)  Funds collected pursuant to section 46-16.8 have been expended in the county-designated transit-oriented development area in which the development is located. (b) As used in this section: "Floor area ratio" means the quotient, expressed as a decimal number, that results from dividing a structure's total floor area by the total area of the lot or parcel on which the structure is located. "Ministerial" means a permit process based upon standards established through county ordinance or rule and issued by the director of the county agency responsible for land use or a single county officer designated by ordinance. "Transit-supportive density" means a floor area ratio of at least: (1)  4.0 for all uses that are permitted in a county‑designated transit-oriented development area or by the underlying county zoning; (2)  6.0 for all uses that are permitted in a county‑designated transit-oriented development area within one-half mile of a station of a locally preferred alternative for a mass transit project; and (3)  For all uses that are permitted within one-quarter mile of a station of a locally preferred alternative for a mass transit project, whichever is greater: (A)  7.0; (B)  The maximum floor area ratio allowed by the adopted transit-oriented development special district; or (C)  The maximum floor area ratio allowed by the applicable transit-oriented development plan." SECTION 3.  Section 201H-202, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§201H-202  Rental housing revolving fund.  (a) There is established the rental housing revolving fund to be administered by the corporation. (b) An amount from the fund, to be set by the corporation and authorized by the legislature, may be used for administrative expenses incurred by the corporation in administering the corporation's housing finance programs; provided that fund moneys shall not be used to finance day‑to‑day administrative expenses of projects allotted fund moneys. (c) The following may be deposited into the fund:  appropriations made by the legislature, conveyance taxes pursuant to section 247-7, private contributions, repayment of loans, interest, other returns, and moneys from other sources. (d) The fund shall be used to provide loans for the development, pre-development, construction, acquisition, preservation, and substantial rehabilitation of rental housing units. The corporation shall not forgive any loan made from the fund unless the corporation forecloses on the project. Permitted uses of the fund may include but are not limited to planning, design, land acquisition, costs of options, agreements of sale, downpayments, equity financing, capacity building of nonprofit housing developers, credit enhancement, gap financing, or other housing development services or activities as provided in rules adopted by the corporation pursuant to chapter 91.  The rules may provide for a means of recapturing loans or grants made from the fund if a rental housing project financed under the fund is refinanced or sold at a later date.  The rules may also provide that moneys from the fund shall be leveraged with other financial resources to the extent possible. (e) Moneys available in the fund shall be used for the purpose of providing, in whole or in part, loans for rental housing projects demonstrating project readiness, efficiency, and feasibility acceptable to the corporation in the following order of priority: (1)  For projects that were awarded low-income housing credits pursuant to paragraph (2), priority shall be given to projects with a perpetual affordability commitment; (2)  Projects or units in projects that are allocated low‑income housing credits pursuant to the state housing credit ceiling under section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or projects or units in projects that are funded by programs of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and United States Department of Agriculture Rural Development wherein: (A)  At least fifty per cent of the available units are for persons and families with incomes at or below eighty per cent of the median family income of which at least five per cent of the available units are for persons and families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the median family income; and (B)  The remaining units are for persons and families with incomes at or below one hundred per cent of the median family income; provided that the corporation may establish rules to ensure full occupancy of fund projects; [and] (3)  Mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed‑income rental project wherein all of the available units are for persons and families with incomes at or below one hundred forty per cent of the median family income[.]; provided that the project meets the criteria in section 201H-    and standards for project readiness, efficiency, and feasibility; and (4)  Mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed‑income rental project wherein all of the available units are for persons and families with incomes at or below one hundred forty per cent of the median family income. (f)  At least fifty-one per cent of the moneys in the fund used for mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed-income rental project shall be prioritized for counties that have expended funds pursuant to section 46-16.8(f); provided that the majority of transit-oriented development areas surrounding stations of a locally preferred alternative for a mass transit project adopt development standards for transit-oriented development pursuant to section 201H-  . [(f)] (g)  There is established within the fund a bond volume cap recycling program subaccount. The bond volume cap recycling program subaccount shall be maintained as a reserve for the bond volume cap recycling program established pursuant to section 39B-2(f). [(g)] (h)  The corporation shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session describing the projects funded and, with respect to rental housing projects targeted for persons and families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the median family income, its efforts to develop those rental housing projects, a description of proposals submitted for this target group and action taken on the proposals, and any barriers to developing housing units for this target group. [(h)] (i)  For the purposes of this subpart, the applicable median family income shall be the median family income for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area in which the project is located as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, as adjusted from time to time. [(i)] (j)  The corporation may provide loans under this section; provided that the corporation shall establish loan‑to‑value ratios to protect the fund from inordinate risk and that under no circumstances shall the rules permit the loan‑to-value ratio to exceed one hundred per cent; provided further that the underwriting guidelines include a debt-coverage ratio of no less than 1.0 to 1. [(j)] (k)  For the period commencing July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2009, the fund may be used to provide grants for rental units set aside for persons and families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the median family income in any project financed in whole or in part by the fund in proportion of those units to the total number of units in the project.  At the conclusion of the period described in this subsection, the corporation shall report to the legislature on the number and use of grants provided and whether the grants were an effective use of the funds for purposes of developing rental housing for families at or below thirty per cent of the median family income." SECTION 4.  Section 206E-246, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The board shall develop a transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement district program to identify infrastructure improvements within each district.  In determining the required infrastructure improvements to be undertaken, the board shall consider the infrastructure needs of transit-supportive density pursuant to section 201H-   , the strategic plan prepared by the Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented development pursuant to section 226-63(c) and subsequent plans and studies prepared to further implement the strategic plan and the transit-oriented development projects therein. The board shall also adopt additional criteria specified in section 201H-  (a), including transit-supportive density requirements." SECTION 5.  Section 226-63, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§226-63[]]  Hawaii interagency council for transit‑oriented development[.]; transit-oriented development planning and implementation.  (a)  There is established the Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented development, which shall be an advisory body exempt from section 26-34, to coordinate and facilitate state agency transit-oriented development planning, and facilitate consultation and collaboration between the State and the counties on transit-oriented development initiatives.  The Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented development shall be established within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes. (b) The Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented development shall: (1)  Serve as the State's transit-oriented development planning and policy development entity with representation from state and county government and the community; (2)  Formulate and advise the governor on the implementation of a strategic plan to [address] plan for and implement transit-oriented development projects, including [mixed use] mixed-use and affordable for-sale and rental housing projects, on [state] lands in county-designated transit-oriented development areas in each county; (3)  Facilitate the acquisition of funding and resources for state and county transit-oriented development programs, including affordable for-sale and rental housing projects, on state and county lands; (4)  Monitor the preparation and conduct of plans and studies to facilitate implementation of state transit‑oriented development plans prepared pursuant to this section, including but not limited to the preparation of site or master plans and implementation plans and studies; (5)  Review all capital improvement project requests to the legislature for transit-oriented development projects, including [mixed use] mixed-use and affordable for‑sale and rental housing projects, on [state] lands within county-designated transit-oriented development [zones] areas or within a one-half-mile radius of public transit stations, if a county has not designated transit-oriented development zones; (6)  Recommend policy, regulatory, and statutory changes, and identify resource strategies for the successful execution of the strategic plan; (7)  Assemble accurate fiscal and demographic information to support policy development and track outcomes; (8)  Consider collaborative transit-oriented development initiatives of other states that have demonstrated positive outcomes; and (9)  Report annually to the governor, the legislature, and the mayor of each county on the progress of its activities, including formulation and progress on the strategic plan no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (c) The strategic plan developed by the Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented development shall: (1)  Coordinate with the counties on transit-oriented development; (2)  For each county, compile an inventory of state, county, and [private sector] private-sector transit‑oriented development projects lacking infrastructure, identifying the type of infrastructure each project lacks, and the approximate time frame when additional capacity is needed; (3)  Prioritize the development of transit-oriented development projects, including [mixed use] mixed-use and affordable for-sale and rental housing projects, on state and county lands; (4)  Identify financing and prioritize state financing for the public infrastructure, facility, and service investments required to support transit-oriented development, [mixed use,] mixed-use, and affordable for-sale and rental housing [project plans; and] in county-designated transit-oriented development areas; (5)  Encourage and promote partnerships between public and private entities to identify, renovate, and secure affordable housing options on state and county lands within county-designated transit-oriented development areas or within a one-half-mile radius of public transit stations, if a county has not designated transit-oriented development [zones.] areas; and (6)  Delineate for each county, transit-oriented development areas within which transit-rich, pedestrian-oriented development is desired and investment in transit-oriented development and supporting infrastructure is to be directed. (d)  For the purposes of this part and implementation of the strategic plan statewide: "County-designated transit-oriented development area" or "county-designated transit-oriented development zone" means a geographic area designated by a county for transit-oriented development by an adopted ordinance, plan, or resolution, and delineated in the strategic plan pursuant to this section.  These areas shall generally consist of lands within a one‑half‑mile radius of a transit hub or transit station but may extend further when there is state and county agreement about the extent of the transit-oriented development area. "Transit-oriented development" means the development of compact, dense, walkable, pedestrian-oriented, mixed-use neighborhoods centered around transit stations or transit hubs of public transit systems. Transit-oriented development features a mix of uses, such as housing, office, retail, civic and institutional, and other services and amenities at densities that support transit ridership and walkability. "Transit-oriented development project" means a development project with a medium- to high-density mix of uses, such as housing, office, retail, and other amenities, that is designed to promote walkability and safe and convenient access to transit services.  Transit-oriented development projects shall be located within geographic areas designated as transit-oriented development areas by the county." SECTION 6.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.